src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/verbCon_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Contracted verbs (without contracted -it verbs). OADDÁT_IV, TJUOLLÀT_IV, STRÀFFUT_IV, DULLUT_IV, BASSUT_IV

Tests:
  Verb - bivvát: # OADDÁT_IV
    bivvát+V+IV+Inf: bivvát 
    bivvát+V+IV+Sup: bivvátjit
    bivvát+V+IV+Ger: bivvádijn
    bivvát+V+IV+PrfPrc: bivvám
    bivvát+V+IV+PrsPrc: bivvájiddje
    bivvát+V+IV+Actio+Ess: bivvámin
    bivvát+V+IV+Actio+Ela: bivvámis
    bivvát+V+IV+VAbess: bivvák
    bivvát+V+IV+VGen: bivvá
    bivvát+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: bivváv
    bivvát+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: bivvá
    bivvát+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: bivvá
    bivvát+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: bivvájin 
    bivvát+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: bivvábihtte
    bivvát+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: bivvába
    bivvát+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: bivváji
    bivvát+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: bivvájiv
    bivvát+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: bivváji
    bivvát+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: bivváj
    bivvát+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: bivvájma 
    bivvát+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: bivvájda
    bivvát+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: bivvájin
    bivvát+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: bivvá
    bivvát+V+IV+Imprt+Pl1: bivvájip
    bivvát+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: bivvájihtit
    bivvát+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2+Sh: bivvájit
    bivvát+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: bivvájisá
    bivvát+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: bivvájuhtut
    bivvát+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: bivvájusá
    bivvát+V+IV+Pot+Pl1: bivvátjip
    bivvát+V+IV+Pot+Pl2: bivvátjihpit
    bivvát+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: bivvátji
    bivvát+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: bivváduvvat
    bivvát+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: bivváduvvá
    bivvát+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: bivválulu
    bivvát+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: bivválulujma

  Verb - jåhttåt: # OADDÁT_IV
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Inf: jåhttåt 
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Sup: jåhttåtjit
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Ger: jåhttådijn
    jåhttåt+V+IV+PrfPrc: jåhttåm
    jåhttåt+V+IV+PrsPrc: jåhttåjiddje
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Actio+Ess: jåhttåmin
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Actio+Ela: jåhttåmis
    jåhttåt+V+IV+VAbess: jåhttåk
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jåhttåv
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: jåhttå
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: jåhttåbihtit
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Sh: jåhttåbit
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: jåhttåji
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: jåhttåjiv
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: jåhttåji
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: jåhttåj
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: jåhttåjma 
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: jåhttåjda
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: jåhttåjga
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: jåhttå
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: jåhttåjis
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: jåhttåjinno 
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: jåhttåjihtte
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: jåhttåjiska
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: jåhttåjihtit
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2+Sh: jåhttåjit
    jåhttåt+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: jåhttåjup
    jåhttåt+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: jåhttåjuhtut
    jåhttåt+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: jåhttåjusá
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: jåhttåtjav
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: jåhttåtja
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: jåhttåsj
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: jåhttåtji
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: jåhttåduvvat
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jåhttåduvvá
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: jåhttålulu
    jåhttåt+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: jåhttålulujma
    

  Verb - tjierrut: # OADDÁT_IV
    tjierrut+V+IV+Inf: tjierrut 
    tjierrut+V+IV+Sup: tjierrutjit
    tjierrut+V+IV+Ger: tjierrudijn
    tjierrut+V+IV+PrfPrc: tjierrum
    tjierrut+V+IV+PrsPrc: tjierrujiddje
    tjierrut+V+IV+Actio+Ess: tjierrumin
    tjierrut+V+IV+Actio+Ela: tjierrumis
    tjierrut+V+IV+VAbess: tjierruk
    tjierrut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tjierruv
    tjierrut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tjierru
    tjierrut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tjierru
    tjierrut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: tjierrujin 
    tjierrut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: tjierrubihtte
    tjierrut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: tjierruba
    tjierrut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tjierruji
    tjierrut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tjierrujiv
    tjierrut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tjierruji
    tjierrut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tjierruj
    tjierrut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: tjierrujma 
    tjierrut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: tjierrujda
    tjierrut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tjierrujin
    tjierrut+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: tjierru
    tjierrut+V+IV+Imprt+Pl1: tjierrujip
    tjierrut+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: tjierrujihtit
    tjierrut+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2+Sh: tjierrujit
    tjierrut+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: tjierrujisá
    tjierrut+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: tjierrujuhtut
    tjierrut+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: tjierrujusá
    tjierrut+V+IV+Pot+Pl1: tjierrutjip
    tjierrut+V+IV+Pot+Pl2: tjierrutjihpit
    tjierrut+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: tjierrutji
    tjierrut+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: tjierruduvvat
    tjierrut+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tjierruduvvá
    tjierrut+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: tjierrululu
    tjierrut+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: tjierrululujma

  Verb - barggát: # TJUOLLÁT_TV
    barggát+V+TV+Inf: barggát 
    barggát+V+TV+Sup: barggátjit
    barggát+V+TV+Ger: barggádijn
    barggát+V+TV+PrfPrc: barggám
    barggát+V+TV+PrsPrc: barggájiddje
    barggát+V+TV+Actio+Ess: barggámin
    barggát+V+TV+Actio+Ela: barggámis
    barggát+V+TV+VAbess: barggák
    barggát+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: barggáv
    barggát+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: barggá
    barggát+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: barggá
    barggát+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: barggájin 
    barggát+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: barggábihtte
    barggát+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: barggába
    barggát+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: barggáji
    barggát+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: barggájiv
    barggát+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: barggáji
    barggát+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: barggáj
    barggát+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: barggájma 
    barggát+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: barggájda
    barggát+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: barggájin
    barggát+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: barggá
    barggát+V+TV+Imprt+Pl1: barggájip
    barggát+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2+Sh: barggájit
    barggát+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: barggájihtit
    barggát+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2+Sh: barggájit
    barggát+V+TV+Imprt+Pl3: barggájisá
    barggát+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: barggájuhtut
    barggát+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: barggájusá
    barggát+V+TV+Pot+Pl1: barggátjip
    barggát+V+TV+Pot+Pl2: barggátjihpit
    barggát+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: barggátji
    barggát+V+TV+Der/Pass+V+Inf: []
    barggát+V+TV+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: []
    barggát+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: barggálulu
    barggát+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: barggálulujma

  Verb - ráddut: # STRÁFFUT_TV
    ráddut+V+TV+Inf: ráddut 
    ráddut+V+TV+Sup: ráddutjit
    ráddut+V+TV+Ger: ráddudijn
    ráddut+V+TV+PrfPrc: ráddum
    ráddut+V+TV+PrsPrc: ráddujiddje
    ráddut+V+TV+Actio+Ess: ráddumin
    ráddut+V+TV+Actio+Ela: ráddumis
    ráddut+V+TV+VAbess: rádduk
    ráddut+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rádduv
    ráddut+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ráddu
    ráddut+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ráddubihtit
    ráddut+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Sh: ráddubit
    ráddut+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: rádduji
    ráddut+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ráddujiv
    ráddut+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: rádduji
    ráddut+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: rádduj
    ráddut+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: ráddujma 
    ráddut+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: ráddujda
    ráddut+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: ráddujga
    ráddut+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: ráddu
    ráddut+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: ráddujis
    ráddut+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: ráddujinno 
    ráddut+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: ráddujihtte
    ráddut+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: ráddujiska
    ráddut+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: ráddujihtit
    ráddut+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2+Sh: ráddujit
    ráddut+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: ráddujup
    ráddut+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: ráddujuhtut
    ráddut+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: ráddujusá
    ráddut+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: ráddutjav
    ráddut+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: ráddutja
    ráddut+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: ráddusj
    ráddut+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: ráddutji
    ráddut+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: rádduduvvat
    ráddut+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rádduduváv
    ráddut+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: ráddululu
    ráddut+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: ráddululujma

  Verb - madtjut: # DULLUT_IV
    madtjut+V+IV+Inf: madtjut 
    madtjut+V+IV+Sup: madtjutjit
    madtjut+V+IV+Ger: madtjudijn
    madtjut+V+IV+PrfPrc: madtjum
    madtjut+V+IV+PrsPrc: madtjujiddje
    madtjut+V+IV+Actio+Ess: madtjumin
    madtjut+V+IV+Actio+Ela: madtjumis
    madtjut+V+IV+VAbess: madtjuk
    madtjut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: madtjuv
    madtjut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: madtju
    madtjut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: madtju
    madtjut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: madtjujin 
    madtjut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: madtjubihtte
    madtjut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: madtjuba
    madtjut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: madtjuji
    madtjut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: madtjujiv
    madtjut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: madtjuji
    madtjut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: madtjuj
    madtjut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: madtjujma 
    madtjut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: madtjujda
    madtjut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: madtjujin
    madtjut+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: madtju
    madtjut+V+IV+Imprt+Pl1: madtjujip
    madtjut+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: madtjujihtit
    madtjut+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2+Sh: madtjujit
    madtjut+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: madtjujisá
    madtjut+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: madtjujuhtut
    madtjut+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: madtjujusá
    madtjut+V+IV+Pot+Pl1: madtjutjip
    madtjut+V+IV+Pot+Pl2: madtjutjihpit
    madtjut+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: madtjutji
    madtjut+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: madtjuduvvat
    madtjut+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: madtjuduvvá
    madtjut+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: madtjululu
    madtjut+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: madtjululujma

  Verb - slágut: # DULLUT_IV
    slágut+V+IV+Inf: slágut 
    slágut+V+IV+Sup: slágutjit
    slágut+V+IV+Ger: slágudijn
    slágut+V+IV+PrfPrc: slágum
    slágut+V+IV+PrsPrc: slágujiddje
    slágut+V+IV+Actio+Ess: slágumin
    slágut+V+IV+Actio+Ela: slágumis
    slágut+V+IV+VAbess: sláguk
    slágut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sláguv
    slágut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: slágu
    slágut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: slágubihtit
    slágut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Sh: slágubit
    slágut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: sláguji
    slágut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: slágujiv
    slágut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: sláguji
    slágut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sláguj
    slágut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: slágujma 
    slágut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: slágujda
    slágut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: slágujga
    slágut+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: slágu
    slágut+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: slágujis
    slágut+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: slágujinno 
    slágut+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: slágujihtte
    slágut+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: slágujiska
    slágut+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2+Sh: slágujit
    slágut+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: slágujihtit
    slágut+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: slágujup
    slágut+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: slágujuhtut
    slágut+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: slágujusá
    slágut+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: slágutjav
    slágut+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: slágutja
    slágut+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: slágusj
    slágut+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: slágutji
    slágut+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: sláguduvvat
    slágut+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sláguduvvá
    slágut+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: slágululu
    slágut+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: slágululujma

  Verb - nåhkkut: # BASSUT_IV
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Inf: nåhkkut 
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Sup: nåhkkutjit
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Ger: nåhkkudijn
    nåhkkut+V+IV+PrfPrc: nåhkkum
    nåhkkut+V+IV+PrsPrc: nåhkkujiddje
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Actio+Ess: nåhkkumin
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Actio+Ela: nåhkkumis
    nåhkkut+V+IV+VAbess: nåhkkuk
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nåhkkuv
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: nåhkku
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nåhkku
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: nåhkkujin 
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: nåhkkubihtte
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: nåhkkuba
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: nåhkkuji
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: nåhkkujiv
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: nåhkkuji
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: nåhkkuj
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: nåhkkujma 
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: nåhkkujda
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: nåhkkujin
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: nåhkku
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Imprt+Pl1: nåhkkujip
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: nåhkkujihtit
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2+Sh: nåhkkujit
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: nåhkkujisá
    nåhkkut+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: nåhkkujuhtut
    nåhkkut+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: nåhkkujusá
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Pot+Pl1: nåhkkutjip
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Pot+Pl2: nåhkkutjihpit
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: nåhkkutji
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Der/Pass+V+Inf: [] # already passive
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: nåhkkululu
    nåhkkut+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: nåhkkululujma
